Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 36.69.010 and 1991 c 363 s 79 are each amended to read as follows:Park and recreation districts are hereby authorized to be formed as municipal corporations for the purpose of providing leisure time activities and facilities and recreational facilities, of a nonprofit nature as a public service to the residents of the geographical areas included within their boundaries.The term "recreational facilities" means parks, playgrounds, gymnasiums, swimming pools, field houses, bathing beaches, stadiums, golf courses, automobile racetracks and drag strips, coliseums for the display of spectator sports, public campgrounds, boat ramps and launching sites, public hunting and fishing areas, arboretums, bicycle and bridle paths, senior citizen centers, or community centers, including community centers which could include public libraries within less than 50 percent of the usable space, provided that any public library is operated in accordance with chapter 27.12 RCW, and other recreational facilities.--- END ---